incubator/apertium-ku-fa.ku.dix
    <pardef n="od/e__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyê</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eya</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyê</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyek</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyekê</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyeke</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>ake</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyên</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyên</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyên</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyin</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyinan</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyine</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyê</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyan</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="şem/b__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>bê</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ba</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>bê</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>bekê</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>beke</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>bên</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ban</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>bên</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>binan</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>bine</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>bê</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ban</l>
          <r>b<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="jin__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ekê</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eke</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>an</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>inan</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ine</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>an</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

    </pardef>

    <!-- Proper nouns -->

    <e lm="sêv"><i>sêv</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ode"><i>od</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="proje"><i>proj</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wate"><i>wat</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="şemb"><i>şem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yekşemb"><i>yekşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duşemb"><i>duşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sêşemb"><i>sêşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çarşemb"><i>çarşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pêncşemb"><i>pêncşem</i><par n="şem/b__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adekirin"><i>adekirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajotin"><i>ajotin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amûr"><i>amûr</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astengbûn"><i>astengbûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avjenkirin"><i>avjenkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aşkirin"><i>aşkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bangkirin"><i>bangkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bawernekirin"><i>bawernekirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berhem"><i>berhem</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beşdarkirin"><i>beşdarkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bilindbûn"><i>bilindbûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biryarbûn"><i>biryarbûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bîranîn"><i>bîranîn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="civak"><i>civak</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daketin"><i>daketin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dawet"><i>dawet</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demjimêr"><i>demjimêr</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="derya"><i>derya</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dewlet"><i>dewlet</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dor"><i>dor</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dûrxistin"><i>dûrxistin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firotin"><i>firotin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gihîştin"><i>gihîştin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gotar"><i>gotar</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guherîn"><i>guherîn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hebûn"><i>hebûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herêm"><i>herêm</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hewl"><i>hewl</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hişkbûn"><i>hişkbûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hînkirin"><i>hînkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jiyan"><i>jiyan</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keser"><i>keser</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komar"><i>komar</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krîz"><i>krîz</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lawazbûn"><i>lawazbûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="malbat"><i>malbat</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meş"><i>meş</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mîhrîcan"><i>mîhrîcan</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nebûn"><i>nebûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nistecihbûn"><i>nistecihbûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nîşan"><i>nîşan</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parçekirin"><i>parçekirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peşkêşkirin"><i>peşkêşkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pênûs"><i>pênûs</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşwazîkirin"><i>pêşwazîkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="qanûn"><i>qanûn</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="qutkirin"><i>qutkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ramûsan"><i>ramûsan</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rewş"><i>rewş</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rondik"><i>rondik</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rêzkirin"><i>rêzkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sedem"><i>sedem</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sernivîs"><i>sernivîs</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stran"><i>stran</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teror"><i>teror</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tunekirin"><i>tunekirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vederkirin"><i>vederkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wergerandin"><i>wergerandin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xasm"><i>xasm</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xerîb"><i>xerîb</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xwarin"><i>xwarin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xwîs"><i>xwîs</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zanist"><i>zanist</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zuhakirin"><i>zuhakirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çareserkirin"><i>çareserkirin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çêlek"><i>çêlek</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="şandin"><i>şandin</i><par n="jin__n"/></e>
